Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SAVAGE AND BURNSVILLE; TRUNK HIGHWAY 13 LOCAL ROAD IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $18,400,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for one or more grants to the city of Savage, the city of Burnsville, or both, for property and easement acquisition, final design, and construction of intersection improvements along marked Trunk Highway 13 at Quentin Avenue, Lynn Avenue, Chowen Avenue, and Washburn Avenue, and the associated frontage roads, backage roads, connecting local streets, and utility infrastructure improvements, if necessary or required for construction. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $18,400,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TRUNK HIGHWAY 13 IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $50,100,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for property and easement acquisition, final design, and construction of improvements to marked Trunk Highway 13 through the cities of Savage and Burnsville. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in subdivision 1 from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $50,100,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end